en: Made in Germany
bg: Произведено в Германия
ca: Fet a Alemanya
cs: Vyrobeno v Německu
da: Fremstillet i Tyskland
de: Hergestellt in Deutschland
es: Hecho en Alemania
fi: Valmistettu Saksassa
fr: Fabriqué en Allemagne
he: נוצר בגרמניה
hr: proizvedeno u Njemačkoj
hu: Németországban készült
it: Fatto in Germania
nb: Produsert i Tyskland
nl: Geproduceerd in Duitsland
pl: Wyprodukowano w Niemczech
pt: Fabricado na Alemanha, feito na Alemanha, produto da Alemanha, produzido na Alemanha, originário da Alemanha, proveniente da Alemanha
sv: Tillverkad i Tyskland
th: ผลิตในเยอรมนี

en: packaged in Germany
bg: опаковано в Германия
ca: envasat a Alemanya
cs: baleno v Německu
da: pakket i Tyskland
de: abgepackt in deutschland
es: empaquetado en Alemania
fi: pakattu Saksassa
fr: conditionné en Allemagne
he: מארז בגרמניה
hr: pakirano u Njemačkoj
hu: csomagolva Németországban
it: confezionato in Germania
nl: verpakt in Duitsland
pl: zapakowane w Niemczech
pt: embalado na Alemanha
sv: förpackad i Tyskland

en: Made in Belgium
bg: Произведено в Белгия
ca: Fet a Bèlgica
da: Fremstillet i Belgien
de: Hergestellt in Belgien
es: Hecho en Bélgica
fi: Valmistettu Belgiassa
fr: Fabriqué en Belgique
he: נוצר בבלגיה
hr: proizvedeno u Belgiji
hu: Belgiumban készült
it: Fatto in Belgio
nl: Geproduceerd in België
pl: Wyprodukowano w Belgii
pt: Fabricado na Bélgica, feito na Bélgica, produto da Bélgica, produzido na Bélgica, originário da Bélgica, proveniente da Bélgica

en: Made in Canada
xx: Made in Canada
fr: Fait au Canada

en: Product of Canada
xx: Product of Canada
fr: Produit du Canada

en: Canadian Geographical Indication, Canadian GI
xx: Canadian Geographical Indication
fr: Indication géographique canadienne, IG canadienne

en: Canadian Whisky
xx: Canadian Whisky
fr: Whisky canadien

en: Canadian Rye Whisky
xx: Canadian Rye Whisky
fr: Whisky de seigle canadien

en: Okanagan Valley
xx: Okanagan Valley
fr: Vallée de l'Okanagan

en: Niagara Peninsula
xx: Niagara Peninsula
fr: Péninsule du Niagara

en: Ontario Icewine
xx: Ontario Icewine

en: Vin de glace du Québec, Quebec Icewine
xx: Vin de glace du Québec
fr: Vin de glace du Québec

en: Maïs sucré de Neuville, Neuville Sweet Corn
xx: Maïs sucré de Neuville
fr: Maïs sucré de Neuville

en: Chilean front-of-package nutrition warnings
es: Etiquetados de alimentos de Ley de Alimentos (Ministerio de Salud)

en: High in sugars (Chile Ministry of Health)
es: Alto en azúcares (Ministerio de Salud)

en: High in saturated fats (Chile Ministry of Health)
es: Alto en grasas saturadas (Ministerio de Salud)

en: High in sodium (Chile Ministry of Health)
es: Alto en sodio (Ministerio de Salud)

en: High in calories (Chile Ministry of Health)
es: Alto en calorías (Ministerio de Salud)

en: Made in France
bg: Произведено във Франция
ca: Fet a França
cs: Vyrobeno ve Francii
da: Fremstillet i Frankrig
de: Hergestellt in Frankreich
el: Κατασκευασμένο στην Γαλλία
es: Hecho en Francia
et: Valmistatud Prantsusmaal
fi: Valmistettu Ranskassa
fr: Fabriqué en France, production française, produit de France, fabrication française, élaboré en France, élaboration française
he: נוצר בצרפת
hr: proizvedeno u Francuskoj
hu: Franciaországban készült
it: Prodotto in Francia, fatto in Francia
lt: Pagaminta Prancūzijoje
lv: Ražots Francijā
nl: Geproduceerd in Frankrijk
pl: Wyprodukowano we Francji
pt: Fabricado em França, feito em França, produto de França, produzido em França, originário de França, proveniente de França, fabricado na França, feito na França, produto da França, produzido na França, originário da França, proveniente da França
ro: Fabricat în Franța
ru: Произведено во Франции
sk: Vyrobené vo Francúzsku
sl: Proizvedeno v Franciji
sv: Tillverkad i Frankrike
th: ผลิตในประเทศฝรั่งเศส
tr: Fransa'da üretilmiştir
uk: Зроблено у Франції
zh: 法国制造

en: Cooked in France
ca: Cuinat a França
de: In Frankreich gekocht
es: Cocinado en francia
fi: kypsennetty ranskassa
fr: Cuisiné en France
he: בושל בצרפת
it: Cucinato in Francia
pt: Cozinhado em França, cozinhado em França, cozinhado de França, cozinhado da França, cozinhado na França